Utah statutes.
16-6a-807.   Resignation of directors.

(1)  A director may resign at any time by giving written notice of resignation to the nonprofit corporation.

(2)  A resignation of a director is effective when the notice is received by the nonprofit corporation unless the notice specifies a later effective date.

(3)  A director who resigns may deliver to the division for filing a statement that the director resigns pursuant to Section 16-6a-1608.

(4)  The failure to attend or meet obligations shall be effective as a resignation at the time of the board of director's vote to confirm the failure if:

(a)  at the beginning of a director's term on the board, the bylaws provide that a director may be considered to have resigned for failing to:

(i)  attend a specified number of board meetings; or

(ii)  meet other specified obligations of directors; and

(b)  the failure to attend or meet obligations is confirmed by an affirmative vote of the board of directors.

